Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 1
PROCEDURE FOR ADOPTION

31-16-101. Ordinance powers - penalty.

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (1), the governing body of each municipality has power to provide for enforcement of ordinances adopted by it by a fine of not more than two thousand six hundred fifty dollars, or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

The limitation on municipal court fines set forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) shall be adjusted for inflation on January 1, 2014, and on January 1 of each year thereafter.

As used in this paragraph (b), "inflation" means the annual percentage change in the United States department of labor, bureau of labor statistics, consumer price index for Denver-Boulder, all items, all urban consumers, or its successor index.

Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the governing body of each municipality which implements an industrial wastewater pretreatment program pursuant to the federal act, as defined in section 25-8-103 (8), C.R.S., may seek such relief and impose such penalties as are required by such federal act and its implementing regulations for such programs.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1123, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 90:

Entire section amended, p. 1345, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(1) amended, p. 756, § 28, effective April 4.

L. 2013:

(1) amended, (HB 13-1060), ch. 121, p. 411, § 2, effective April 18.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 31-12-101 (79) and 31-12-301 as they existed prior to 1975.

31-16-102. Style of ordinances.

The style of the ordinances in cities and towns shall be: "Be it ordained by the city council or board of trustees of ............ ."

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1123, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-12-302 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-16-103. Majority must vote for appropriations - proving ordinances.

Ordinances, resolutions, and orders for the appropriation of money shall require for their passage or adoption the concurrence of a majority of the governing body of any city or town. Unless otherwise specifically provided by statute or ordinance, all other actions of the governing body upon which a vote is taken shall require for adoption the concurrence of a majority of those present if a quorum exists. All ordinances may be proven by the seal of the city or town, and, when printed in book or pamphlet form and purporting to be printed and published by authority of the city or town, the same shall be received in evidence in all courts and places without further proof.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1123, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 1292, § 14, effective April 6.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 756, § 29, effective April 4.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-12-303 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-16-104. Ordinances approved by mayor.

Only if an ordinance adopted pursuant to section 31-4-102 (3) or 31-4-302 so provides, any ordinance adopted and all resolutions authorizing the expenditure of money or the entering into of a contract require the approval and signature of the mayor before they become valid, except as otherwise provided in this section. Such ordinance or resolution shall be presented to the mayor within forty-eight hours after the action of the governing body for his signature approving the same. If he disapproves, he shall return such ordinance or resolution to the governing body at its next regular meeting with his objections in writing. The governing body shall cause such objections to be entered at large upon the record and shall proceed at the same or next subsequent meeting to consider the question: "Shall the ordinance or resolution, notwithstanding the mayor's objections, be passed?" If two-thirds of the members of the governing body vote in the affirmative, such resolution shall be valid, and such ordinance shall become a law the same as if it had been approved by the mayor. If the mayor fails to return to the next subsequent meeting of the governing body any resolution or ordinance presented to him for his approval, the same shall become a valid ordinance or resolution, as the case may be, in like manner as if it had been approved by him.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1123, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1495, § 9, effective May 28.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 1293, § 15, effective April 6.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-12-304 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-16-105. Record and publication of ordinances.

All ordinances, as soon as may be after their adoption, shall be recorded in a book kept for that purpose and shall be authenticated by the signature of the presiding officer of the governing body and the clerk. All ordinances of a general or permanent nature and those imposing any fine, penalty, or forfeiture, following adoption and, if required by ordinance adopted pursuant to section 31-4-102 (3) or 31-4-302, compliance with the provisions of section 31-16-104, shall be published in some newspaper published within the limits of the city or town or, if there are none, in some newspaper of general circulation in the city or town. It is a sufficient defense to any suit or prosecution for such fine, penalty, or forfeiture to show that no publication was made. If there is no newspaper published or having a general circulation within the limits of the city or town, then, upon a resolution being passed by the governing body to that effect, ordinances may be published by posting copies thereof in three public places within the limits of the city or town, to be designated by the governing body. Except for ordinances calling for special elections or necessary to the immediate preservation of the public health or safety and containing the reasons making the same necessary in a separate section, such ordinances shall not take effect and be in force before thirty days after they have been so published. The excepted ordinances shall take effect upon adoption and, if required by ordinance adopted pursuant to section 31-4-102 (3) or 31-4-302, compliance with the provisions of section 31-16-104 if they are adopted by an affirmative vote of three-fourths of the members of the governing body of the city or town. The book of ordinances provided for in this section shall be taken and considered in all courts of this state as prima facie evidence that such ordinances have been published as provided by law. Any municipality may determine at a regular or special election to meet the requirements of this section and section 31-16-106 by publishing ordinances by title only rather than by publishing the ordinance in full. No municipality shall call a special election for the sole purpose of determining the issue of whether the municipality should publish new ordinances in full or by title only.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1123, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1496, § 10, effective May 28.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1053, § 3, effective January 1, 1993.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-12-305 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-16-106. Reading before city council - publication.

No ordinance shall be adopted by any city council of any city unless the same has been previously introduced and read at a preceding regular or special meeting of such city council and published in full in the manner provided in section 31-16-105 at least ten days before its adoption. The previous introduction of the ordinance at such preceding meeting of the city council and the fact of its publication shall appear in the certificate and the attestation of the clerk on the ordinance after its adoption. The provisions of section 31-16-105 shall apply to any ordinance adopted by a city council; except that, if publication after introduction was in a newspaper, publication after adoption may be in the same newspaper by title only and shall contain the date of the initial publication and shall reprint in full any section, subsection, or paragraph of the ordinance which was amended following the initial publication. Publication following adoption may be in full at the discretion of the city council.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1124, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 1466, § 1, effective May 20.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-15-104 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-16-107. Reading - adoption of code.

Whenever the reading of an ordinance or of a code which is to be adopted by reference is required by statute, any such requirement shall be deemed to be satisfied if the title of the proposed ordinance is read and the entire text of the proposed ordinance or of any code which is to be adopted by reference is submitted in writing to the governing body before adoption.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1124, § 1, effective July 1.

31-16-108. Majority of all members required - record.

On the adoption of an ordinance, resolution, or order for the appropriation of money or the entering into of a contract by the governing body of any city or town, the yeas and nays shall be called and recorded, and the concurrence of a majority of the governing body shall be required.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1124, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 1293, § 16, effective April 6.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 756, § 30, effective April 4.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-12-306 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-16-109. Disposition of fines and forfeitures.

All fines and forfeitures for the violation of ordinances and all moneys collected for licenses or otherwise shall be paid into the treasury of the city or town at such times and in such manner as may be prescribed by ordinance, or, if there is no ordinance referring to the case, it shall be paid to the treasurer at once.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1124, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-12-307 as it existed prior to 1975.

Cross references:

For disposition of fines and forfeitures involving the operation of motor vehicles, see § 42-1-217.

31-16-110. County officers may serve process.

Any sheriff of any county or city and county of this state may serve, within such sheriff's county, any process issued from any court or may make any arrest within such sheriff's county, authorized by law to be made by any municipal officers; but the only process or warrant for the arrest of any person charged with a violation of a municipal ordinance which shall be valid and executed outside the municipality where said violation occurred is that for the violation of an ordinance of any municipality in this state which is a criminal or quasi-criminal offense. For the purposes of this section, traffic offenses shall not be considered to be criminal or quasi-criminal offenses unless penalty points may be assessed under section 42-2-127 (5)(a) to (5)(r), (5)(w), and (5)(x), C.R.S.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1124, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 795, § 9, effective June 3.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 2565, § 78, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-12-308 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-16-111. One-year limitation of suits.

All suits for the recovery of any fine and prosecutions for the commission of any offense made punishable under any ordinance of any municipality shall be barred one year after the commission of the offense for which the fine is sought to be recovered.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1125, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-12-309 as it existed prior to 1975.